Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB382.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 198B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Approved safety pool cover" means a manually-operated or power-
operated safety pool cover that meets all ASTM International performance
standards;
(b) "Barrier or enclosure" means a fence, wall, or any combination thereof,
that surrounds a swimming pool completely and obstructs access to the
swimming pool from the area outside the barrier or enclosure;
(c) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government,
urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified local
government; and
(d) "Swimming pool":
1. Means any structure intended for swimming or recreational bathing
that contains water over twenty-four (24) inches deep; and
2. Includes but is not limited to in-ground pools, hot tubs, spas, and
fixed-in-place wading pools.
(2) The department shall allow a private swimming pool to be constructed without a
barrier or enclosure if the swimming pool will be equipped with an approved
safety pool cover.
(3) The department shall incorporate the provisions of this section into the Kentucky
Building Code by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The legislative body of a local government may, by ordinance, adopt more
stringent requirements to govern approved safety pool covers and barriers or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/13/2026 3:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1537
enclosures than those specified in subsection (2) of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/13/2026 3:51 PM Jacketed